Florida, session 2026, SB1044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSection 742.17, Florida Statutes, is amended to 43 read: 44 742.17âDisposition of eggs, sperm, or preembryos; rights of 45 inheritance.âA commissioning couple and the treating physician 46 shall enter into a written agreement that provides for the 47 future use of the embryos by the commissioning couple, continued 48 storage with payment, embryo transfer to another couple, 49 permission for or prohibition of research donation, selections 50 for contingencies per s. 742.175(4)(b), and the disposition of 51 the commissioning coupleâs eggs, sperm, and preembryos in the 52 event of a divorce, the death of a spouse, or any other 53 unforeseen circumstance. 54 (1)âAbsent a written agreement, any remaining eggs or sperm 55 shall remain under the control of the party that provides the 56 eggs or sperm. 57 (2)âAbsent a written agreement, decisionmaking authority 58 regarding the disposition of preembryos shall reside jointly 59 with the commissioning couple. 60 (3)âAbsent a written agreement, in the case of the death of 61 one member of the commissioning couple, any eggs, sperm, or 62 preembryos shall remain under the control of the surviving 63 member of the commissioning couple. 64 (4)âA child conceived from the eggs or sperm of a person or 65 persons who died before the transfer of their eggs, sperm, or 66 preembryos to a womanâs body shall not be eligible for a claim 67 against the decedentâs estate unless the child has been provided 68 for by the decedentâs will. 69 Section 2.âSection 742.175, Florida Statutes, is created to 70 read: 71 742.175âAssisted reproductive technology; informed consent; 72 required disclosures; embryo disposition.â 73 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 74 (a)ââAssisted reproductive technologyâ has the same meaning 75 as provided in s. 742.13 and includes in vitro fertilization, 76 intracytoplasmic sperm injection, embryo culture, 77 cryopreservation, and embryo transfer. 78 (b)ââCommissioning coupleâ has the same meaning as provided 79 in s. 742.13. 80 (c)ââCryopreservationâ means, with respect to embryos, 81 freezing the embryos in an undisturbed environment for the 82 purpose of saving them for future procreative use. 83 (d)ââCycleâ means a single procedure of in vitro 84 fertilization, zygote intrafallopian transfer, or gamete 85 intrafallopian transfer. 86 (e)ââEmbryoâ means the product of fertilization of an egg 87 by a sperm until the appearance of the embryonic axis. 88 (f)ââHealth care providerâ means a health care practitioner 89 as defined in s. 456.001 who is authorized to provide assisted 90 reproductive technology services under his or her applicable 91 scope of practice. 92 (g)ââIndependently reported success rate dataâ means 93 public, audited data on assisted reproductive technology 94 outcomes, including national and clinic-level reports, 95 maintained by the United States Centers for Disease Control and 96 Preventionâs National ART Surveillance System and the Society 97 for Assisted Reproductive Technology. 98 (h)ââInformed consentâ means a voluntary, written, and 99 signed authorization, executed after receipt of the disclosures 100 required by this section provided in plain language 101 understandable to a layperson. 102 (i)ââIn vitro fertilizationâ means a form of assisted 103 reproductive technology in which an egg retrieved from a womanâs 104 ovaries is fertilized with sperm in a culture medium in a 105 laboratory and then transferred to the uterus for the purpose of 106 producing a pregnancy. 107 (j)ââSelective reductionâ means an abortion as defined in 108 s. 390.011 which reduces the number of fetuses in a multifetal 109 pregnancy by one or more to lower maternal and neonatal risks 110 and results in the intentional death of one or more fetuses with 111 the goal of continuing the pregnancy with fewer fetuses. 112 (k)ââSingle-embryo transferâ means transferring one embryo 113 in a given transfer procedure to reduce the risk of multiple 114 gestation, consistent with professional guidelines that limit 115 the number of embryos transferred by age and prognosis. 116 (l)ââTransferâ means the process by which a health care 117 provider places a fresh or frozen embryo within the uterus, 118 fallopian tubes, or other part of a patientâs body for the 119 purpose of initiating a pregnancy. 120 (2)âINFORMED CONSENT REQUIRED.â 121 (a)âA health care provider may not perform in vitro 122 fertilization, including ovarian stimulation, egg retrieval, 123 fertilization, embryo biopsy, embryo storage, and embryo 124 transfer, until each adult patient and, if applicable, both 125 members of the commissioning couple have executed the informed 126 consent form required under subsection (3). 127 (b)âA health care provider must obtain informed consent 128 each time a new cycle is undertaken and must provide updated 129 information to the patient with the latest statistics and 130 findings concerning the patientâs status with each new cycle. 131 (c)âThis section supplements ss. 742.11â742.17 and does not 132 diminish requirements for written agreements regarding gamete 133 and embryo disposition under s. 742.17. 134 (d)âThis section does not prohibit a physician from 135 providing any additional information the physician deems 136 material to the patientâs informed decision to undergo in vitro 137 fertilization. 138 (3)âINFORMED CONSENT FORM.â 139 (a)âThe informed consent form must include all of the 140 following: 141 1.âA description of the in vitro fertilization procedure. 142 2.âInformation about embryo conception and transfer, 143 including the patientâs right to determine the number of embryos 144 or eggs to conceive and transfer, and the most recent scientific 145 information on the number of embryos needed to be transferred to 146 achieve a successful pregnancy. 147 3.âA statement that the patient retains the right to 148 withhold or withdraw consent at any time before transfer of 149 gametes or embryos without affecting the patientâs right to 150 future care or treatment. 151 4.âA description of the facilityâs practice regarding 152 selecting embryos that are viable to transfer and the outcome 153 for embryos that are deemed not viable for transfer, including 154 whether those embryos will be destroyed or used for training or 155 research. 156 5.âA description of the facilityâs practice regarding 157 cryopreservation of embryos and the associated costs. 158 6.âThe effect of the following on treatment, embryos, and 159 the validity of informed consent: the health care providerâs 160 practice closing; divorce; separation; failure to pay storage 161 fees for nontransferred embryos; failure to pay treatment fees; 162 inability to agree on the fate of embryos; the death of a 163 patient or others; withdrawal of consent for transfer after 164 fertilization but before cryopreservation; incapacity; 165 unavailability of agreed-upon disposition of embryos; or loss of 166 contact with the facility. 167 (b)âThe informed consent form must also disclose all of the 168 following: 169 1.âMedical risks to the person undergoing treatment, 170 including all of the following: 171 a.âMedication and ovarian response risks, including ovarian 172 hyperstimulation syndrome. The form must describe signs and 173 symptoms of and methods for preventing ovarian hyperstimulation 174 syndrome, including the use of individualized ovarian 175 stimulation, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist triggers, 176 and freezing all embryos after a cycle to transfer in a 177 separate, subsequent cycle. The form must also state that 178 moderate-to-severe ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome occurs in 179 approximately 1 to 5 percent of cycles, varying by individual 180 risk and declining with modern prevention methods. 181 b.âProcedure and anesthesia risks from egg retrieval, 182 including pain, bleeding, infection, injury to adjacent 183 structures, and rare serious complications. 184 c.âPregnancy-related risks, including ectopic pregnancy, 185 miscarriage, hypertensive disorders, and diabetes, noting that 186 ectopic pregnancy after in vitro fertilization has been reported 187 in the range of approximately 1.4 to 3.2 percent of in vitro 188 fertilization pregnancies, with patient-specific variation. 189 2.âMedical risks to children conceived through in vitro 190 fertilization, specifically that: 191 a.âMultiple gestation carries increased risks of 192 prematurity, low birth weight, and neonatal morbidity compared 193 with singletons; and 194 b.âMost children conceived through in vitro fertilization 195 are healthy, but some adverse outcomes, including premature 196 births or low birth weights among singleton pregnancies, have 197 been observed in surveillance reports, and that historic 198 multiple-embryo transfer practices contributed to higher 199 multiple-birth rates. 200 3.âRisks of multiple gestation and selective reduction. The 201 disclosure must: 202 a.âDescribe maternal and neonatal complications associated 203 with multiple gestation and explain that preventing multiple 204 gestation is the safest strategy. 205 b.âDefine selective reduction as provided in this section 206 and include the following statement: âIf two or more embryos 207 implant, your physician may discuss an option that entails 208 intentionally ending the life of one or more fetuses to reduce 209 the total number of fetuses. You may accept or decline this 210 option.â 211 c.âSpecify that, in accordance with chapter 390, any 212 selective reduction must be performed before the gestational age 213 of the fetus progresses beyond 6 weeks, unless an exception 214 under s. 390.0111(1) applies. 215 d.âState that single-embryo transfer is an evidence-based 216 strategy to reduce multiple gestation and that professional 217 guidelines limit the number of embryos to transfer by age and 218 prognosis. 219 e.âIdentify practices available to minimize embryo loss or 220 destruction. The disclosure must enumerate options and allow 221 patient elections that include all of the following: 222 (I)âLimiting fertilization to the number intended for 223 transfer in current and planned cycles. 224 (II)âSinge-embryo transfers where clinically reasonable, 225 avoiding embryo discard based solely on nonmedical traits. 226 (III)âEmbryo cryopreservation and an embryo disposition 227 plan that prioritizes future transfer to the commissioning 228 couple or embryo transfer to another couple. Cryopreserved 229 embryos may be used for research or discarded only if expressly 230 authorized by the patients. 231 (IV)âMild or natural-cycle stimulation protocols when 232 clinically feasible. 233 (V)âPreimplantation genetic testing limitations, including 234 possible no-result or mosaic findings, and the disclosure that 235 results are not infallible and do not require embryo discard. 236 4.âFinancial obligations and costs, including all of the 237 following: 238 a.âA good faith itemized estimate of total cycle costs, 239 including professional and laboratory fees; anesthesia; 240 medications; preimplantation genetic testing, if elected; embryo 241 storage; and anticipated additional procedures. 242 b.âA clear statement that ongoing storage fees will be 243 assessed for cryopreserved embryos and that nonpayment will be 244 handled only as set forth in the patientâs embryo disposition 245 agreement under subsection (4) and s. 742.17. 246 5.âThe health care providerâs transfer policy. If the 247 disclosure does not state the health care providerâs transfer 248 policy, the default transfer policy is to perform single-embryo 249 transfers when clinically reasonable. 250 6.âAlternatives to in vitro fertilization. The disclosure 251 must include a description of reasonable alternatives, which may 252 include, but need not be limited to, timed intercourse, 253 lifestyle and medical optimization, natural procreative 254 technology-informed diagnostics, ovulation induction, 255 intrauterine insemination, use of donor gametes, adoption, 256 expectant management, and counseling. 257 7.âSuccess rates and limits. The disclosure must include 258 all of the following: 259 a.âRequired national benchmarks, including present age 260 stratified independently reported success rate data from the 261 most recent finalized Society for Assisted Reproductive 262 Technology National Summary Report and any companion first 263 transfer and subsequent-transfer tables provided for that year. 264 b.âIndependent sources patients can check, including the 265 URLs in print and electronically for: 266 (I)âThe United States Centers for Disease Control and 267 Prevention National ART Surveillance Systemâs success rates for 268 national and clinic-level data and the Centers for Disease 269 Control and Preventionâs guidance on interpreting cumulative 270 success; and 271 (II)âThe Society for Assisted Reproductive Technologyâs 272 Clinic Summary Report, including national and clinic-level data 273 for the latest finalized year. 274 c.âClinic-specific context, explaining that the data from 275 the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and 276 the Society for Assisted Reproductive Technology is audited, 277 standardized, logged, and finalized after the reporting year, 278 and that individual prognosis varies by age, diagnosis, and 279 treatment plan. 280 d.âA statement that Florida public policy favors singleton 281 birth when medically safe and that health care providers should 282 discuss single-embryo transfer options to reduce the chance of 283 twins or higher-order multiples. 284 (c)âThe informed consent form must include initial lines or 285 checkboxes for each of the following patient elections, which 286 the health care provider shall honor unless such elections are 287 unsafe for the patient or unlawful: 288 289 ...(Initial here)... Embryo creation limit. We 290 authorize insemination or intracytoplasmic sperm 291 injection of no more than ...(insert desired 292 number)... eggs per cycle. 293 294 ...(Initial here)... Embryo transfer. We authorize the 295 transfer of ...(insert desired number)... embryos per 296 cycle. 297 298 ...(Initial here)... Selective reduction preference. 299 Circle one: We decline/may consider selective 300 reduction if recommended. Health care provider policy: 301 ...(insert health care providerâs policy on selective 302 reduction, specifying that all selective reduction 303 procedures must be performed in accordance with 304 chapter 390, Florida Statutes).... 305 306 ...(Initial here)... Preimplantation genetic testing 307 election. Circle one: decline all 308 testing/preimplantation genetic testing for an 309 aneuploidy (PGT-A)/preimplantation genetic testing for 310 a specific condition (PGT-M) (condition: ...(insert 311 condition)...). We understand preimplantation genetic 312 testing is not infallible and does not require embryo 313 discard. 314 315 ...(Initial here)... Financial responsibility. We 316 understand and accept responsibility for storage fees 317 until a disposition permitted above occurs. 318 319 (4)âEMBRYO DISPOSITION; CONTINGENCIES.â 320 (a)âA health care provider shall enter into a disposition 321 agreement pursuant to s. 742.17 which tracks the patientsâ 322 elections under subsection (3). 323 (b)âThe agreement must specify the patientsâ choices upon 324 death or incapacity of one or both patients; divorce or 325 separation; prolonged loss of contact; and nonpayment after a 326 grace period. Options must include continued storage, transfer 327 to the patient or a gestational carrier, or embryo transfer to 328 another couple. Options for research donation or discarding 329 embryos must be expressly selected by the patients in order to 330 occur. 331 (c)âA health care provider may not discard embryos for 332 nonpayment unless all of the following conditions are met: 333 1.âThe agreement expressly authorizes that outcome. 334 2.âThe health care provider has provided at least two 335 written notices to the patientsâ last known addresses and a 90 336 day grace period has passed. 337 3.âSuch action complies with all other applicable laws. 338 (d)âThis section does not require a health care provider to 339 offer services he or she does not provide; however, the health 340 care provider shall disclose his or her policies. 341 (5)âFORM, TIMING, AND LANGUAGE ACCESS.â 342 (a)âA health care provider shall provide the disclosures 343 required by subsection (3) at least 48 hours before the first 344 injectable medication, unless a shorter interval is medically 345 necessary and the patient affirmatively waives the time interval 346 in writing. 347 (b)âA health care provider shall provide the informed 348 consent form in the patientsâ primary language or with a 349 qualified interpreter, and the informed consent form must state 350 whether an interpreter was used. 351 (c)âA health care provider shall offer patients the 352 opportunity to ask questions and to withdraw consent without 353 penalty at any time before embryo transfer. 354 (d)âElectronic signatures are permitted if compliant with 355 state law. 356 (6)âRECORDKEEPING.â 357 (a)âA health care provider shall retain executed informed 358 consent forms, disposition agreements, and any subsequent 359 modifications for at least 7 years after the final embryo is 360 transferred, adopted, or otherwise lawfully disposed of, or for 361 the period required by other applicable law, whichever is 362 longer. 363 (b)âUpon written request, a health care provider shall 364 provide a patient a copy of his or her records without charge 365 within 10 business days after receipt of the written request. 366 (7)âENFORCEMENT.âFailure to obtain informed consent as 367 required by this section constitutes grounds for disciplinary 368 action under s. 456.072. 369 (8)âCONSTRUCTION.â 370 (a)âThis section does not alter parentage presumptions 371 under s. 742.11 or donor provisions under s. 742.14 or the 372 written agreement requirements of s. 742.17. 373 (b)âThis section does not mandate selective reduction or 374 embryo destruction, and patients may decline such procedures. 375 (c)âThe provisions of this section relating to selective 376 reduction operate consistent with, and do not supplant, chapter 377 390. The limitations on abortions specified in s. 390.0111 apply 378 to selective reduction procedures referenced under this section. 379 Chapter 390 prevails in the event of any conflict with this 380 section. 381 (d)âThis section must be construed to permit patient 382 elections that minimize embryo loss consistent with medical 383 safety and applicable laws. 384 (9)âSEVERABILITY.âIf any provision of this section or its 385 application is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect 386 other provisions or applications of this section which can be 387 given effect without the invalid provision or application, and 388 to this end the provisions of this section are severable. 389 Section 3.âParagraph (uu) is added to subsection (1) of 390 section 456.072, Florida Statutes, to read: 391 456.072âGrounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.â 392 (1)âThe following acts shall constitute grounds for which 393 the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be 394 taken: 395 (uu)âViolating any provision of s. 742.175. 396 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.